Utah statutes.
26-18-14.   Strategic plan for health system reform -- Medicaid program.

The department, including the Division of Health Care Financing within the department, shall:

(1)  work with the Governor's Office of Economic Development, the Insurance Department, the Department of Workforce Services, and the Legislature to develop health system reform in accordance with the strategic plan described in Title 63M, Chapter 1, Part 25, Health System Reform Act;

(2)  develop and submit amendments and waivers for the state's Medicaid plan as necessary to carry out the provisions of the Health System Reform Act;

(3)  seek federal approval of an amendment to Utah's Premium Partnership for Health Insurance that would allow the state's Medicaid program to subsidize the purchase of health insurance by an individual who does not have access to employer sponsored health insurance;

(4)  in coordination with the Department of Workforce Services:

(a)  establish a Children's Health Insurance Program eligibility policy, consistent with federal requirements and Subsection 26-40-105(1)(d), that prohibits enrollment of a child in the program if the child's parent qualifies for assistance under Utah's Premium Partnership for Health Insurance; and

(b)  involve community partners, insurance agents and producers, community based service organizations, and the education community to increase enrollment of eligible employees and individuals in Utah's Premium Partnership for Health Insurance and the Children's Health Insurance Program; and

(5)  as funding permits, and in coordination with the department's adoption of standards for the electronic exchange of clinical health data, help the private sector form an alliance of employers, hospitals and other health care providers, patients, and health insurers to develop and use evidence-based health care quality measures for the purpose of improving health care decision making by health care providers, consumers, and third party payers.

